Washington statutes.
RCW 18.390.070

Inspections by prospective residents—Resident expectations—Right to file complaint.

(1) A prospective resident may visit each of the different care levels of the continuing care retirement community, assisted living facility, and nursing home, and may inspect the most recent inspection reports and findings of complaint investigations related to the assisted living and nursing home components covering a period of not less than two years, as available, prior to signing a residency agreement.

(2) All residents of a continuing care retirement community in a living unit that is not used exclusively for assisted living or nursing services have the following expectations:

(a) Transparency regarding the financial stability of the provider operating the facility;

(b) Timely notifications of developments affecting the facility, including ownership changes of the provider operating the facility, a change in the financial condition of the provider operating the facility, and construction and renovation at the facility. The management of the continuing care retirement community may deem certain information to be confidential if it is of a sensitive nature such that disclosure of the information would materially harm the position of the continuing care retirement community;

(c) Reasonable accommodations for persons with disabilities;

(d) The opportunity to participate freely in the operation of independent resident organizations and associations;

(e) The opportunity to seek independent counsel review of all contracts, including residency agreements, prior to executing the residency agreement; and

(f) The assurance that all requests for donations, contributions, and gifts, when made by residents to the continuing care retirement community, are voluntary and may not be used as a condition of residency.

(3) The continuing care retirement community shall:

(a) Provide a copy of the expectations specified in this section to each prospective resident prior to signing a residency agreement; and

(b) Make copies of the expectations specified in this section publicly available in areas accessible to the independent residents and visitors. The copies of the expectations must also state that independent residents have the right, as an affected party, to file a complaint with the attorney general for violations of this chapter that may constitute a violation of the consumer protection act and contain information explaining how and where a complaint may be filed.

[ 2016 c 183 s 7.]